Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 6

Safe Families and Family Preservation Act

37-3-601. Short title — Funding.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe Families and Family Preservation Act.”

The family support services and time-limited family reunification services authorized pursuant to this part shall be subject to the funds appropriated to the department by the Tennessee general assembly.

Acts 1991, ch. 185, § 1; 1998, ch. 1097, § 23.

37-3-602. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Family preservation services” mean short-term, highly intensive, services designed to protect, treat, and support a family, with a child at imminent risk of placement, by enabling the family to remain intact and care for the child at home;

“Family support services” means community-based services to promote the safety and well-being of children and families designed to increase the strength and stability of families, including adoptive, foster, and extended families, to increase parents' confidence and competence in their parenting abilities, to afford children a safe, stable and supportive family environment, and otherwise to enhance child development;

“Imminent risk of placement” means circumstances or behavior likely to produce, within a relatively short period of time, a reasonably strong probability that the child will be placed in state custody as a result of being adjudicated dependent and neglected, delinquent and unruly, or in need of mental health services under § 37-1-175; and

“Time-limited family reunification services” means the services and activities described below that are provided to a child that is removed from the child's home and placed in a foster family home or a child care institution and to the parents or primary caregiver of such a child, in order to facilitate the reunification of the child safely and appropriately within a timely fashion, but only during the fifteen-month period that begins on the date that the child, pursuant to § 37-2-402, is considered to have entered foster care. The services and activities described in this subdivision (4) are the following individual, group and family counseling services:

Inpatient, residential, or outpatient substance abuse treatment services;

Mental health services;

Assistance to address domestic violence;

Services designed to provide temporary child care and therapeutic services for families, including crisis nurseries; and

Transportation to or from any of the services and activities described in this subdivision (4).

Acts 1991, ch. 185, § 2; 1996, ch. 1079, § 120; 1998, ch. 1097, § 24; 2000, ch. 947, § 8G.

37-3-603. Program to provide family preservation services.

The department of children's services shall develop, coordinate and implement a program to provide family services to each family with a child at imminent risk of placement; provided, that delivery of family preservation services shall be limited to those families and situations in which the services may be reasonably expected to avoid out-of-home placement of the child and to also afford effective protection of the child, the family, and the community.

The department shall develop, coordinate and implement a program to provide time-limited family reunification services to each family with a child in foster care; provided, that delivery of time-limited family reunification services shall be limited to those foster children or parents or primary caregiver and shall be limited to the fifteen-month period that begins on the date that the child, pursuant to § 37-2-402, is considered to have entered foster care.

Acts 1991, ch. 185, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1998, ch. 1097, § 25.

37-3-604. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 185, § 4; 1998, ch. 1097, § 26; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(n); 2013, ch. 236, § 25; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 212, § 2, effective April 20, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-3-604 concerned evaluation of family preservation services; joint report; contents.

37-3-605. Statute implementation.

Beginning with fiscal year 1994-1995, the departments of children's services, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities shall jointly implement the program of family preservation services at a level sufficient to meet the need for such services across the state. Effective July 1, 1998, the department of children's services shall have sole responsibility for implementing this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 974, § 4; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1998, ch. 1097, § 27; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 59; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For assignment of implementation of the provisions of Acts 1994, ch. 974 to the office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.